Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 14. Special Funds.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 182, SLA 1978 purported to add an article 2, entitled “University Fund,” to this chapter.
Section 27 of ch. 182 made that article effective on the date that the Board of Regents voted to approve the matters under consideration as provided in § 24 of the act.
However, the Board of Regents disapproved all matters on August 17, 1978; consequently, that article 2 did not take effect.